Utah statutes.
75-4-205.   Powers.

A domiciliary foreign personal representative who has complied with Section 75-4-204 may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local personal representative and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons other than individuals acting as foreign personal representatives unless the state of the principal place of business of such foreign personal representative provides substantially similar provisions applicable to personal representatives from this state.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

